Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1 RELINQUISHMENT
19-5-103.7. Anticipated expedited relinquishment - children under one year of age - notice to other or possible parent - administrative procedures.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 19-5-103 to the contrary, a licensed child placement agency assisting a parent who plans to relinquish a child through an expedited relinquishment pursuant to section 19-5-103.5, may provide notice of the anticipated
expedited relinquishment on behalf of the relinquishing parent to any other birth parent or possible birth parent identified pursuant to section 19-5-105 (2) who is not a presumed parent pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1).

The licensed child placement agency may give notice of the anticipated expedited relinquishment prior to or after the filing of the affidavit and petition with the court, but not more than sixty-three days prior to the anticipated birth of the child to
be relinquished.

Notice to the other birth parent or possible birth parent given pursuant to this section shall be provided:

By publication appearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the person's last known address, if the person's identity is known, or the county in which the relinquishing parent reports the conception to have occurred. Notice by publication
is only proper if a person has not been identified as the other birth parent or possible birth parent or the location of the other birth parent or possible birth parent has not been determined after diligent efforts.

In person, delivered:

In a manner appropriate under the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure for the service of process; or

By an employee or a representative of the licensed child placement agency assisting the relinquishing parent, with a requirement that the other birth parent or possible birth parent sign a statement acknowledging receipt of the notice; or

By certified mail to only the other birth parent or possible birth parent, return receipt requested, with return receipt providing prima facie evidence of service.

The date of notice shall be considered either the date on which the notice is delivered pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or the date on the return receipt for notice given by certified mail pursuant to subparagraph
(III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), whichever is applicable. If notice is provided by publication, the date of notice shall be the date of the first day of publication.

Notice of the anticipated expedited relinquishment given pursuant to this section shall include the name, mailing address, and physical address of the licensed child placement agency providing the notice and shall inform the other birth parent or possible
birth parent of the following:

The name of the parent of the child who anticipates seeking to relinquish his or her parental rights for purposes of the child's adoption and the anticipated date of birth or the actual date of birth of the child;

That the other birth parent or possible birth parent has been identified by the parent who anticipates seeking to relinquish his or her parental rights as potentially being the other birth parent of the child, or, if no other birth parent or possible
birth parent has been identified, that the parent who anticipates seeking to relinquish his or her parental rights is unable to identify the other birth parent or possible birth parent;

That placing a child for adoption requires termination of the child's parent-child legal relationships;

That the other birth parent or possible birth parent has a right to contest the termination of parental rights; and

That failure to declare an intent to contest the termination of parental rights may likely result in a termination of the person's parental rights to the child, and that, to declare an intent to contest the termination of the parent-child legal relationship,
the other birth parent or possible birth parent shall:

No later than twenty-one days after the date of notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section or before a relinquishment petition is filed with the court, whichever occurs later, either return a reply form to the licensed child placement
agency by certified mail, return receipt requested, or personally appear at the licensed child placement agency to declare an intent to contest the termination of parental rights; and

No later than twenty-one days after the date of notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section or before a relinquishment petition is filed with the court, whichever occurs later, file a claim of paternity pursuant to article 4 of
this title and notify the licensed child placement agency pursuant to section 19-4-105.5 (4);

That the other birth parent or possible birth parent may waive the right to contest the termination of parental rights and that waiver may likely result in a termination of the person's parental rights to the child; and

That further notice related to the anticipated expedited relinquishment proceedings shall not be provided to the other birth parent or possible birth parent without receipt of a response required by subparagraph (V) of this paragraph (a).

Except when notice is provided by publication, the licensed child placement agency assisting the relinquishing parent with an expedited relinquishment shall send or deliver a reply form described in sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (V) of paragraph
(a) of this subsection (4) to the other birth parent or possible birth parent at the same time and by the same method as the delivery of notice given pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The reply form sent
pursuant to this paragraph (b), or otherwise available at the licensed child placement agency pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of this section, shall be signed by the other birth parent or possible birth
parent, witnessed, and dated, and shall require the other birth parent or possible birth parent to disclose the following information to the licensed child placement agency:

The full name of the other birth parent or possible birth parent;

The name of the relinquishing parent and the anticipated date of birth or the actual date of birth of the child to be relinquished, as listed on the notice;

The other birth parent's or possible birth parent's address;

The case number of the pending action filed, if any, by the other birth parent or the possible birth parent for determination of the parent-child legal relationship pertaining to the child to be relinquished; and

If a case concerning the determination of the parent-child legal relationship pertaining to the child to be relinquished has been filed, a copy of any court orders issued regarding the other birth parent's or possible birth parent's parent-child legal
relationship.

In addition to the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the reply form sent or delivered pursuant to this paragraph (b), or otherwise available at the licensed child placement agency pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of this
section, shall provide response options for selection by the other birth parent or the possible birth parent replying to the notice, which response options shall be substantially similar to the following:

That the person replying to the notice acknowledges that there may be a parent-child legal relationship, declares an intent to contest the termination of parental rights, and declares an intent to seek to have the court make this determination;

That the person replying to the notice acknowledges that there may be a parent-child legal relationship, waives the right to contest a termination of parental rights, and waives the right to further notice concerning the expedited relinquishment and the
termination of parental rights with respect to the child; and

That the person replying to the notice does not acknowledge that there may be a parent-child legal relationship, waives the right to contest a termination of parental rights, and waives the right to further notice concerning the expedited relinquishment
and the termination of parental rights with respect to the child.

In addition to the requirements of subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (b), the reply form sent or delivered pursuant to this paragraph (b), or otherwise available at the licensed child placement agency pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection
(7) of this section, shall include a statement of acknowledgment by the other birth parent or possible birth parent that there is a requirement to file a claim of paternity and to notify the licensed child placement
agency pursuant to section 19-4-105.5 (4) no later than twenty days after the date of notice or before a relinquishment petition is filed with the court, whichever occurs later.

To properly reply and declare an intent to contest the termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to this section, the other birth parent or possible birth parent shall, no later than twenty days after receiving notice pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section or before a relinquishment petition is filed with the court, whichever occurs later:

Return a reply form to the licensed child placement agency by certified mail, return receipt requested, or, for other birth parents or possible birth parents who receive notice by publication or who otherwise decide not to return the reply form by certified
mail, personally appear at the licensed child placement agency to declare an intent to contest the termination of parental rights in the anticipated proceedings; and

File a claim of paternity pursuant to article 4 of this title and notify the licensed child placement agency pursuant to section 19-4-105.5 (4).

The other birth parent or possible birth parent who is served with notice pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and fails to reply as required in subsection (5) of this section irrevocably waives the right to further notice of proceedings related
to the anticipated expedited relinquishment and irrevocably waives the right to appear and contest the termination of his or her parental rights, unless the other birth parent or possible birth parent proves, by clear and convincing
evidence, the following:

That it was not possible for the other birth parent or possible birth parent to properly reply and declare an intent to contest the termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to the requirements of subsection (5) of this section; and

That the other birth parent or possible birth parent did properly reply and declare an intent to contest the termination of the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to the requirements of subsection (5) of this section within twenty days after it
became possible for the other birth parent or possible birth parent to do so.

If the other birth parent or possible birth parent replies to the notice provided pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by returning the reply form via certified mail to the licensed child placement agency that sent the notice, the licensed child
placement agency shall accept and file the original reply form with the court upon filing the petition for relinquishment or upon receipt of the reply form, whichever occurs later. The date of the reply shall be then noted
on the return receipt.

If the other birth parent or possible birth parent replies to the notice provided pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by appearing in person at the licensed child placement agency to declare his or her response, the licensed child placement agency
shall provide a reply form for the other birth parent or the possible birth parent to complete and sign. An agency or social services employee shall sign the form as a witness. The licensed child placement agency shall
accept the completed, signed reply form, provide a copy of the form to the other birth parent or the possible birth parent, and file the original with the court upon filing the petition for relinquishment or upon receipt
of the completed reply form, whichever occurs later. The date of the reply shall be the date on which the other birth parent or the possible birth parent signs the reply.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the other birth parent or possible birth parent replies to notice provided by publication pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by contacting the licensed child placement agency in
a manner other than is specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (7), and the other birth parent or possible birth parent provides his or her full name and address, the licensed child placement agency shall:

Within seven days after the contact, and by certified mail, return receipt requested, send a reply form to the other birth parent or possible birth parent with a written statement informing the person that the date he or she contacted the licensed child
placement agency in response to the notice received shall be considered his or her date of reply if he or she returns the form no later than fourteen days after the date noted on the return receipt, and
that, if he or she returns the form more than fourteen days after the date noted on the return receipt, the date the licensed child placement agency actually receives the reply form shall be considered his
or her reply date; and

Maintain a dated record to submit to the court of all communications made related to this paragraph (c).

The date of reply provided in the manner described in this paragraph (c) shall be the date the other birth parent or possible birth parent contacts the licensed child placement agency in response to the notice received if he or she returns the form no
later than fourteen days after the date noted on the return receipt of the form. If the other birth parent or possible birth parent returns the form more than fourteen days after the date noted on the return receipt,
the date the reply is received by the licensed child placement agency shall be considered the reply date.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the other birth parent or possible birth parent files a claim of paternity pursuant to article 4 of this title and provides notice to the licensed child placement agency pursuant to section
19-4-105.5, then such claim and notice shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subsection (5) of this section, so long as the claim of paternity is filed and notice is provided to the licensed child placement agency
no later than twenty-one days after receiving notice pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or before a relinquishment petition is filed with the court.

The other birth parent or possible birth parent who replies to a licensed child placement agency pursuant to this subsection (7) shall notify the agency of any change in his or her address.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the licensed child placement agency shall respond as specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (f) and shall not have the duty to respond as required in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection (7) or to file any further documentation of a respondent's reply if, before the respondent replies to the notice as described in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection (7), all of the following
have occurred:

The relinquishment petition has been filed with the court;

At least twenty-one days have passed since the notice was provided; and

The licensed child placement agency has filed the affidavit of administrative notice described in subsection (8) of this section with the court.

If the requirements specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (f) have been met before the respondent replies to the notice as described in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection (7), the licensed child placement agency shall provide the
respondent, to the extent of the agency's knowledge, with the following information:

Verification that the petitions and affidavit have been filed;

The court in which the case was filed;

The case number; and

Whether the court has ordered the termination of the respondent's parental rights.

A licensed child placement agency that provides notice of the anticipated expedited relinquishment on behalf of the relinquishing parent to the other birth parent or possible birth parent pursuant to the provisions of this section shall have the duty
to file with the court the following information at the time it files the petition for relinquishment:

An affidavit of administrative notice with respect to the other birth parent or possible birth parent who has received notice pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, including the following information, if available:

The method of providing notice;

The date of notice;

The deadline for reply;

The date of the reply;

The intent declared in the reply;

A statement indicating whether an action relating to the parent and child legal relationship was filed;

A statement indicating whether the person's reply was timely; and

A statement indicating that the expedited relinquishment was filed pursuant to section 19-5-103.5.

In addition to the affidavit of administrative notice filed with the court pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), the licensed child placement agency shall file all available evidence supporting the affidavit, including but not limited to signed
return receipts, completed reply forms, affidavits of service of process, evidence of publication, evidence of the filing of an action relating to the parent and child legal relationship, and any other records of pertinent
communication with the possible birth parent or other birth parent.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a parent who plans to relinquish a child through an expedited relinquishment pursuant to section 19-5-103.5 to file the expedited relinquishment.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the filing of a petition and affidavit of relinquishment prior to the birth of a child.

Source:

L. 2005:
Entire section added, p. 95, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
(3)(a)(II) amended and (7)(f) added, pp. 114, 113, §§ 3, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:
(2), (4)(a)(V), (7)(c)(I)(A), (7)(c)(II), (7)(d), and (7)(f)(I)(B) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 875, § 137, effective July 1.

19-5-104. Final order of relinquishment.

If the court terminates the parent-child legal relationship of both parents or of the only living parent, the court, after taking into account the religious background of the child, shall order guardianship of the person and legal custody transferred
to:

The county department of human or social services; or

A licensed child placement agency; or

A relative of the child; or

An individual determined to be of good moral character through a process that includes the assessment made pursuant to section 19-5-206 (2)(g), if such individual shall have had the child living in his or her home for six months or more, including a foster
parent or a designated adoptive parent.

The court shall consider, but shall not be bound by, a request that custody of the child, with the option of applying for adoption, be placed in a grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, or sister of the child or a foster parent. When ordering legal custody
of the child, the court shall give preference to a grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, or sister of the child when such relative has made a timely request therefor and the court determines that such placement is in the best
interests of the child. Such request must be submitted to the court prior to commencement of the hearing on the petition for relinquishment. If such legal custody is granted, guardianship of the child shall remain with
the parent, if the legal parent-child relationship has not been terminated, or the guardianship shall be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the
birth parents or the child placement agency with custody of the child to notify said relatives described in this subsection (2) of the pending relinquishment of parental rights. This subsection (2) shall not apply in cases
where the birth parents have designated an adoptive family for the child or the birth parents have designated that legal custody of the child shall not be in a person described in this subsection (2) and where the child
has not been in legal custody of a relative requesting guardianship or custody as described in this section or the child has not been in the physical custody of such relative for more than six months.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), in cases in which a parent is seeking to relinquish his or her parent-child legal relationship with more than one child of a sibling group at one time, if the county department or
child placement agency locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, the court shall presume that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint
placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a
child or of the children.

No person shall be precluded from adopting a child solely because that person has been a child's foster parent.

The order of relinquishment shall set forth all pertinent facts brought at the hearing, and, in addition, it shall state that the court is satisfied that the counsel and guidance provided for in section 19-5-103 (1) and (5) has been offered the relinquishing
parent or parents and any child for whom the court has ordered counseling.

A final order of relinquishment shall divest the relinquishing parent or parents of all legal rights and obligations they may have with respect to the child relinquished, but it shall not modify the child's status as an heir at law which shall cease only
upon a subsequent final decree of adoption; except that the relinquishing parent's or parents' obligation to pay for services received by the child through the department, or other support received, shall be terminated upon a subsequent
final decree of adoption or by order of the court at the time of relinquishment. The order of relinquishment shall release the relinquished child from all legal obligations with respect to the relinquishing parent or parents.

If one parent files a petition for the relinquishment of a child and the agency or person having custody of the child files a petition to terminate the rights of the other parent pursuant to section 19-5-105, the court shall set a hearing, as expeditiously
as possible, on the relinquishment petition. A court may enter an order of relinquishment for the purpose of adoption prior to the relinquishment or termination of the other parent's parental rights. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (7) of this section, an order of relinquishment is final and irrevocable.

A relinquishment may be revoked only if, within ninety-one days after the entry of the relinquishment order, the relinquishing parent establishes by clear and convincing evidence that such relinquishment was obtained by fraud or duress.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (7), a relinquishment may not be revoked on the basis that the relinquishment or termination of the other parent's parental rights was not obtained because the relinquishing parent knew, but did not disclose,
the name or whereabouts of such other parent.

If the relinquishment by an individual is revoked pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and no grounds exist under section 19-5-105 or under part 6 of article 3 of this title for terminating the parental rights of that individual, the court shall
dismiss any proceeding for adoption and shall provide for the care and custody of the child according to the child's best interests.

The fact that the relinquishing parent or parents are minors shall in no way affect the validity of the final order of relinquishment.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 802, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 88:
(1)(d) and (2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 757, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 94:
(4.3), (4.5), and (4.7) added, p. 747, § 2, effective April 20; (4) amended, p. 2688, § 210, effective July 1.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 1158, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 2627, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2010:
IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 10-1106), ch. 278, p. 1273, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2012:
(7)(a) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 877, § 138, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 426, § 67, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-4-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-105. Proceeding to terminate parent-child legal relationship.

If one parent relinquishes or proposes to relinquish or consents to the adoption of a child, the agency or person having custody of the child shall file a petition in the juvenile court to terminate the parent-child legal relationship of the other parent,
unless the other parent's relationship to the child has been previously terminated or determined by a court not to exist. This section applies whether or not the other parent is a presumed parent pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1).

In an effort to identify the other birth parent, the court shall cause inquiry to be made of the known parent and any other appropriate person. The inquiry shall include the following: Whether the mother was married at the time of conception of the child
or at any time thereafter; whether the mother was cohabiting with a man at the time of conception or birth of the child; whether the mother has received support payments or promises of support with respect to the child or in connection
with her pregnancy; or whether any man has formally or informally acknowledged or declared his possible paternity of the child.

If, after the inquiry, the other birth parent is identified to the satisfaction of the court or if more than one person is identified as a possible parent, each shall be given notice of the proceeding in accordance with subsection (5) of this section,
including notice of the person's right to waive his or her right to appear and contest. If any of them waives his or her right to appear and contest or fails to appear or, if appearing, cannot personally assume legal and physical
custody, taking into account the child's age, needs, and individual circumstances, such person's parent-child legal relationship with reference to the child shall be terminated. If the other birth parent or a person representing
himself or herself to be the other birth parent appears and demonstrates the desire and ability to personally assume legal and physical custody of the child, taking into account the child's age, needs, and individual circumstances,
the court shall proceed to determine parentage under article 4 of this title. If the court determines that the person is the other birth parent, the court shall set a hearing, as expeditiously as possible, to determine whether
the interests of the child or of the community require that the other parent's rights be terminated or, if they are not terminated, to determine whether:

To award custody to the other birth parent or to the physical custodian of the child; or

To direct that a dependency and neglect action be filed pursuant to part 5 of article 3 of this title with appropriate orders for the protection of the child during the pendency of the action.

(3.1) The court may order the termination of the other birth parent's parental rights upon a finding that termination is in the best interests of the child and that there is clear and convincing evidence of one or more of the following:

That the parent is unfit. In considering the fitness of the child's parent, the court shall consider the following:

An emotional illness, a behavioral or mental health disorder, or an intellectual and developmental disability of the parent of such duration or nature as to render the parent unlikely, within a reasonable period of time, to care for the ongoing physical,
mental, and emotional needs of the child;

A single incident of life-threatening or serious bodily injury or disfigurement of the child or other children;

Conduct toward the child or other children of a physically or sexually abusive nature;

A history of violent behavior that demonstrates that the individual is unfit to maintain a parent-child relationship with the minor, which may include an incidence of sexual assault, as defined in section 19-1-103, that resulted in the conception of the
child;

Excessive use of intoxicating liquors or use of controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., that affects the ability of the individual to care and provide for the child;

Neglect of the child or other children;

Injury or death of a sibling or other children due to proven abuse or neglect by such parent;

Whether, on two or more occasions, a child in the physical custody of the parent has been adjudicated dependent or neglected in a proceeding under article 3 of this title or comparable proceedings under the laws of another state or the federal government;

Whether, on one or more prior occasions, a parent has had his or her parent-child legal relationship terminated pursuant to this section or article 3 of this title or comparable proceedings under the laws of another state or the federal government.

That the parent has not established a substantial, positive relationship with the child. The court shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the following in determining whether the parent has established a substantial, positive relationship with the
child:

Whether the parent has maintained regular and meaningful contact with the child;

Whether the parent has openly lived with the child for at least one hundred eighty days within the year preceding the filing of the relinquishment petition or, if the child is less than one year old at the time of the filing of the relinquishment petition,
for at least one-half of the child's life; and

Whether the parent has openly held out the child as his or her own child.

That the parent has not promptly taken substantial parental responsibility for the child. In making this determination the court shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Whether the parent who is the subject of the petition is served with notice and fails to file an answer within thirty-five days after service of the notice and petition to terminate the parent-child legal relationship, or within twenty-one days if the
petition for termination was filed pursuant to section 19-5-103.5, or fails to file a paternity action, pursuant to article 4 of this title, within thirty-five days after the birth of the child or within thirty-five
days after receiving notice that he is the father or likely father of the child, or, for those petitions filed pursuant to section 19-5-103.5, within twenty-one days after the birth of the child or after receiving
notice that he is the father or likely father of the child;

Whether the parent has failed to pay regular and reasonable support for the care of the child, according to that parent's means; and

Whether the birth father has failed to substantially assist the mother in the payment of the medical, hospital, and nursing expenses, according to that parent's means, incurred in connection with the pregnancy and birth of the child.

(3.2) In considering the termination of a parent's parental rights, the court shall give paramount consideration to the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child. Such consideration shall specifically include whether the child
has formed a strong, positive bond with the child's physical custodian, the time period that the bond has existed, and whether removal of the child from the physical custodian would likely cause significant psychological harm
to the child.

(3.3) If the child is under one year of age at the time that the relinquishment petition is filed, there is an affirmative defense to any allegations under subparagraph (VI) of paragraph (a), paragraph (b), and paragraph (c) of subsection (3.1) of this
section that the parent's neglect, failure to establish a substantial relationship, or failure to take substantial responsibility for the child was due to impediments created by the other parent or person having custody. A
parent shall demonstrate such impediments created by the other parent or person having custody by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3.4) (a) If the court determines not to terminate the nonrelinquishing parent's parental rights nor to direct that a dependency and neglect action be filed, the court shall proceed to determine custody of the child, parenting time with the child, duty
of support, and recovery of child support debt.

The court shall determine custody based upon the best interests of the child giving paramount consideration to the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child.

If the child has been out of his or her birth parents' care for more than one year, irrespective of incidental communications or visits from the relinquishing or nonrelinquishing parent, there is a rebuttable presumption that the best interests of the
child will be served by granting custody to the person in whose care the child has been for that period. Such presumption may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3.5) Notwithstanding subsection (3.4) of this section, the court shall grant custody of the child to the nonrelinquishing birth parent if the court finds that the birth parent has the ability and the desire to assume personally legal and physical custody
of the child promptly and that all of the following exists:

The nonrelinquishing parent has established a substantial, positive relationship with the child;

The nonrelinquishing parent has promptly taken substantial parental responsibility for the child; and

The award of custody to the nonrelinquishing parent is in the best interests of the child.

(3.6) Except for a parent whose parental rights have been relinquished pursuant to section 19-5-104, a person who has or did have the child in his or her care has the right to intervene as an interested party and to present evidence to the court regarding
the nonrelinquishing parent's contact, communication, and relationship with the child. If custody is at issue pursuant to subsection (3.4) of this section, such person also has the right to present evidence regarding the best
interests of the child and his or her own suitability as a placement for the child.

If, after the inquiry, the court is unable to identify the other birth parent or any other possible birth parent and no person has appeared claiming to be the other birth parent and claiming custodial rights, the court shall enter an order terminating
the unknown birth parent's parent-child legal relationship with reference to the child. Subject to the disposition of an appeal upon the expiration of thirty-five days after an order terminating a parent-child legal relationship
is issued under subsection (3) of this section or this subsection (4), the order cannot be questioned by any person, in any manner, or upon any ground, except fraud upon the court or fraud upon a party. Upon an allegation of fraud,
the termination order cannot be questioned by any person, in any manner or upon any ground, after the expiration of ninety-one days from the date that the order was entered.

Notice of the proceeding shall be given to every person identified as the other birth parent or a possible birth parent in the manner appropriate under the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure for the service of process or in any manner the court directs.
The notice shall inform the parent or alleged parent whose rights are to be determined that failure to file an answer or to appear within thirty-five days after service and, in the case of an alleged father, failure to file a claim
of paternity under article 4 of this title within thirty-five days after service, if a claim has not previously been filed, may likely result in termination of the parent's or the alleged parent's parental rights to the minor.
The notice also shall inform the parent or alleged parent whose rights are to be determined that such person has the right to waive his or her right to appear and contest and that failure to appear and contest may likely result
in termination of the parent's or the alleged parent's parental rights to the minor. Proof of giving the notice shall be filed with the court before the petition is heard. If no person has been identified as the birth parent, the
court shall order that notice be provided to all possible parents by publication or public posting of the notice at times and in places and manner the court deems appropriate.

In those cases in which a parent proposes to relinquish his or her parent-child legal relationship with a child who is under one year of age, pursuant to the expedited procedures set forth in section 19-5-103.5, the licensed child placement agency or
the county department of human or social services assisting the relinquishing parent shall proceed with filing the petition for termination of the other birth parent's or possible birth parents' parent-child legal relationship
and notify the other birth parent or possible birth parents as provided in section 19-5-103.5 (2).

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 803, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 747, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 97:
IP(3), (3.1)(c)(I), and (5) amended, p. 1160, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(3.1)(a)(II) amended, p. 1421, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2001:
(3.1)(a)(VI) amended and (3.1)(a)(VIII) and (3.1)(a)(IX) added, p. 499, § 2, effective May 4.

L. 2003:
(3.1)(c)(I) amended and (6) added, p. 872, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2012:
(3.1)(a)(V) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1625, § 62, effective July 1; (3.1)(c)(I), (4), and (5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 877, § 139, effective July 1.

L. 2014:
(3.1)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 591, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:
IP(3.1)(a) and (3.1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 17-1046), ch. 50, p. 158, § 11, effective March 16; (3.1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1318, § 168, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
(6) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 426, § 68, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(3.1)(a)(IV) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 734, § 84, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-126 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.